180 CHAPTER 6
You Try It!
The following passage is from the U.S. Constitution. As you read it, decide which facts you would include in a summary of the passage.
The Constitution
Article I, Section 2
1.	The House of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every second Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous branch of the State Legislature.
2.	No person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of twenty five years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of the State in which he shall be chosen.
K-...................................................
Chapter 6
Section 1
federal system (p. 182) impeach (p. 184) veto (p. 184)
executive orders (p. 185) pardons (p. 185)
Thurgood Marshall (p. 186) Sandra Day O'Connor (p. 186)
Section 2
James Madison (p. 216) majority rule (p. 216) petition (p. 217) search warrant (p. 218) due process (p. 218) indict (p. 218) double jeopardy (p. 218) eminent domain (p. 218) Section 3
After you read the passage, answer the following questions.
1.	Which of the following statements best summarizes the first paragraph of this passage?
a.	Congress has a House of Representatives.
b.	Members of the House of Representatives are elected every two years by state electors.
2.	Using the steps described on the previous page, write a summary of the second paragraph of this passage.
3.	Combine the summary statement you chose in Question 1 with the summary statement you wrote in Question 2 to create a single summary of this entire passage.
naturalized citizens (p. 222) deport (p. 222) draft (p. 223) interest groups (p. 225a) political action committees
(p. 225b)
Academic Vocabulary
Success in school is related to knowing academic vocabulary— the words that are frequently used in school assignments and discussions. In this chapter, you will learn the following academic words:
distinct (p. 183)
influence (p. 225a)
j As you read Chapter 6, think about what j details you would include in a summary I of each paragraph.
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 181
SECTION
SSSfilSISlSMWBl^BS

TEKS 1A,22A,22B
Understanding the Constitution
What You Will Learn...
, The framers of the Constitution devised the federal system.
, The legislative branch makes the nation's laws.
, The executive branch enforces the nation's laws.
, The judicial branch determines whether or not laws are constitutional.
If YOU were there...
You have just been elected to the U.S. House of Representatives. You know that committees do much of the work in Congress. They deal with many different fields such as foreign policy, agriculture, national security, science, and education. You would like to ask for a spot on a committee whose work interests you.
Which committee would you ask to serve on?
The U.S. Constitution balances the powers of the federal government among the legislative, executive, and judicial branches.
BUILDING BACKGROUND
When the framers of the Constitution met in Philadelphia in 1787, they created a national government with three branches that balance one another's powers. Key Terms and People
federal system, p. 182 impeach, p. 184 veto, p. 184
executive orders, p. 185 pardons, p. 185 Thurgood Marshall, p. 186 Sandra Day O'Connor, p. 186
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the structure of each of the branches of government.
The Federal System
The framers of the Constitution wanted to create a government powerful enough to protect the rights of citizens and defend the country against its enemies. To do so, they set up a federal system of government, a system that divided powers between the states and the federal government. This system is also known as federalism.
The Constitution assigns certain powers to the national government. These are called delegated powers. Among them are the rights to coin money and to regulate trade. Reserved powers are those kept by the states. These powers include creating local governments and holding elections. Concurrent powers are those shared by the federal and state governments. They include taxing, borrowing money, and enforcing laws.
Sometimes, Congress has had to stretch its delegated powers to deal with new or unexpected issues. A clause in the Constitution states that Congress may "make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper" for carrying out its duties. This clause, called the elastic clause—-because it can be stretched (like elastic)—provides flexibility for the government. The federal government has used this clause to provide public services such as funding for the arts and humanities.
READING CHECK
Summarizing How is power divided between the federal and state governments?
CHAPTER 6
QUICr
Separation of Powers

U.S.
Constitution f

Legislative Branch (Congress)
Executive Branch (President)
Judicial Branch (Supreme Court)
Writes the laws
Confirms presidential appointments Approves treaties Grants money Declares war
Proposes laws Administers the laws Commands armed forces
Appoints ambassadors and other officials Conducts foreign policy Makes treaties
Interprets the Constitution and other laws
Reviews lower-court decisions
Legislative Branch
The federal government has three branches, each with distinct responsibilities and powers. This separation balances the branches and keeps any one of them from growing too powerful. The first branch of government is the legislative branch, or Congress. It makes the nation's laws. Article I of the Constitution divides Congress into the House of Representatives and the Senate.
With 435 members, the House of Representatives is the larger congressional house. The U.S. Census, a population count made every 10 years, determines how many members represent each state. A system called apportionment keeps total membership at 435. If one state gains a member, another state loses one. Members must be at least 25 years old, live in the state where they were elected, and have been U.S. citizens for seven years. They serve two-year terms.
The Senate has two members, or senators, per state. Senators represent the interests of the whole state, not just a district. They must be at least 30 years old, have been U.S. citizens for nine years, and live in the state they represent. They serve six-year terms. The senior senator of a state is the one who has served
the longer of the two. Members of Congress can serve an unlimited number of terms in office.
The political party with more members in each house is the majority party. The one with fewer members is the minority party. The leader of the House of Representatives, or Speaker of the House, is elected by House members from the majority party.
The U.S. vice president serves as president of the Senate. He takes no part in Senate debates but can vote to break ties. If he is absent, the president pro tempore (pro tern for short) leads the Senate. There is no law for how the Senate must choose this position, but it traditionally goes to the majority party's senator who has served the longest.
Congress begins sessions, or meetings, each year in the first week of January. Both houses do most of their work in committees. Each committee studies certain types of bills, or suggested laws. For example, all bills about taxes begin in the House Ways and Means Committee.
READING CHECK
Academic
Vocabulary
distinct
separate
Comparing and Contrasting
What are the similarities in requirements for members of the House of Representatives and the Senate? What are the differences?
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 183
I
Checks and Balances	i
Executive Branch (President)
Legislative Branch (Congress)
Checks on:
Executive Branch
•	May reject appointments
•	May reject treaties
•	May withhold funding for presidential initiatives
•	May impeach president
•	May override a veto
Judicial Branch
•	May propose constitutional amendments to overrule judicial decisions
•	May impeach Supreme Court justices
Checks on:
Legislative Branch
•	May adjourn Congress in certain situations
•	May veto bills
Judicial Branch
Appoints judges
Judicial Branch (Supreme Court)
Checks on:
Executive Branch
•	May declare executive actions unconstitutional Legislative Branch
•	May declare laws unconstitutional
Executive Branch
Article II of the Constitution lists the powers of the executive branch. This branch enforces the laws passed by Congress.
President and Vice President
As head of the executive branch, the president is the most powerful elected leader in the United States. To qualify for the presidency or vice presidency, one must be a native-born U.S. citizen at least 35 years old. The president must also have been a U.S. resident for 14 years.
Americans elect a president and vice president every four years. Franklin D. Roosevelt, who won four times, was the only president to serve more than two terms. Now, the Twenty-second Amendment limits presidents to two terms. If a president dies, resigns, or is removed from office, the vice president becomes president for the rest of the term.
The House of Representatives can impeach, or vote to bring charges of serious crimes against, a president. Impeachment cases are tried in the Senate. If a president is found guilty, Congress can remove him from office. In 1868 Andrew Johnson was the first president to be impeached. President Bill Clinton was impeached in 1998. However, the Senate found each man not guilty.
Working with Congress
The president and Congress are often on different sides of an issue. However, they must still work together.
Congress passes laws. The president, however, can ask Congress to pass or reject bills. The president also can veto, or cancel, laws Congress has passed. Congress can try to override, or undo, the veto. However, this is difficult since it takes a two-thirds
B4 CHAPTER 6
majority vote. To carry out laws affecting the Constitution, treaties, and statutes, the president issues executive orders. These commands have the power of law. The president also may grant pardons, or freedom from punishment, to persons convicted of federal crimes or facing criminal charges.
The president also commands the armed forces. In emergencies, the president can call on U.S. troops. Only Congress, however, can declare war. Other executive duties include conducting foreign relations and creating treaties. Executive departments do most of the executive branch work. As of 2004 there were 15 such departments. The president chooses department heads, who are called secretaries, and the Senate approves them. The heads make up the cabinet, which advises the president.
Drawing Conclusions
What is the president's most important power?
Reading Check
Judicial Branch
The third branch of government, the judicial branch, is made up of a system of federal courts headed by the U.S. Supreme Court. The Constitution created the Supreme Court, but the Judiciary Act of 1789 created the system of lower district and circuit courts.
Article III generally outlines the courts' duties. Federal courts can strike down a state or federal law if the court finds a law unconstitutional. Congress can then try to revise the law to make it constitutional.
District Courts
The president makes appointments to federal courts. In an effort to keep federal judges free of party influence, the judges are given life appointments. The lower federal courts are divided according to cases over which they have jurisdiction, or authority. Each state has at least one of the 94 district courts.
THE IMPACT
TODAY
The Office of Homeland Security was established in 2002 to address the increased threat of terrorism following September 11, 2001. In 2003, the office became the Department of Homeland Security, the newest executive department.
Background of the Court
The rest of the Supreme Court decisions you see in this book will highlight important cases of the Court. But in this first one, well discuss the history of the Court.
The first Supreme Court met in 1790 at the Royal Exchange in New York City. The ground floor of this building was an open-air market. When the national government moved to Philadelphia, the Court met in basement rooms in Independence Hall. Once in Washington, the Court heard cases in the Capitol building until the present Supreme Court building was completed in 1932.
Circuit Riding
Today the Supreme Court holds court only in Washington, D.C. In the past, however, the justices had to travel through assigned circuits, hearing cases together with a district judge in a practice known as riding circuit.
The justices complained bitterly about the inconvenience of travel, which was often over unpaved roads and in bad weather. This system was not just inconvenient to the justices, however. Some people worried about the fairness of a system that required justices who had heard cases at trial to rule on them again on appeal. Other people, however, thought that the practice helped keep the justices in touch with the needs and feelings of the average citizen. Eventually,
circuit riding interfered so much with the increased amount of business of the Supreme Court that Congress passed a } law ending the practice in the late 1800s. Path to the Supreme Court When a case is decided by a state or federal court, the losing side may have a chance to appeal the decision to a higher court. Under the federal system, ; this higher court is called the court of j appeals. A person who loses in that court S may then appeal to the Supreme Court to review the case. But the Supreme Court does not have to accept all appeals. It usually chooses to hear only cases in which there is an important legal principle to be decided or if two < federal courts of appeals disagree on how an issue should be decided.
ANALYSIS
SKILLfA^ALYZIWC information
1.	What are two reasons why the practice of circuit riding ended?
2.	Why do you think the Supreme Court does not hear every case that is appealed to it?
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 185
THE IMPACT
TODAY
Supreme Court rulings can have dramatic effects on the nation, as in Bushv. Gore, which decided the outcome of the 2000 presidential election.
Courts of Appeals
If someone convicted of a crime believes the trial was unfair, he or she may take the case to the court of appeals. There are 13 courts of appeals. Each has a panel of judges to decide if cases heard in the lower courts were tried appropriately. If the judges uphold, or accept, the original decision, the original outcome stands. Otherwise, the case may be retried in the lower court.
Supreme Court
After a case is decided by the court of appeals, the losing side may appeal the decision to the Supreme Court. Thousands of cases go to the Supreme Court yearly in the hope of a hearing, but the Court has time to hear only about 100. Generally, the cases heard involve important constitutional or public-interest issues. If the Court declines to hear a case, the court of appeals decision is final.
Nine justices sit on the Supreme Court. The chief justice of the United States leads the Court. Unlike the president and members of Congress, there are no specific constitutional requirements for becoming a justice.
In recent decades, the Supreme Court has become more diverse. In 1967 Thurgood Marshall became the first African American justice. Sandra Day O'Connor became the first female Court justice after her 1981 appointment by President Ronald Reagan.
READING CHECK
Summarizing Describe the structure and responsibilities of the judicial branch.
I
Summary and Preview in this section I you learned about the balance between the different branches of the federal government. In the next section you will learn about the Bill of Rights.
Section 1 Assessment
’^j’l hmhsocialstudies.com
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
1.	a. Describe What type of government did the Constitution establish for the United States? b. Contrast What is the difference between delegated, reserved, and concurrent powers?
2.	a. Recall What role does the vice president serve in the legislative branch?
b.	Compare and Contrast In what ways are the Senate and the House of Representatives similar and different?
c.	Elaborate Why do you think the requirements for serving in the Senate are stricter than those for serving in the House of Representatives?
3.	a. Describe What powers are granted to the president?
b.	Make Generalizations Why is it important that the president and Congress work together in resolving governmental issues?
c.	Evaluate What do you think is the most important power granted to the president? Why?
4.	a. Explain What is the main power of the judicial branch?
b. Evaluate Which branch of government do you feel is most important? Explain your answer.
Critical Thinking
5.	Categorizing Review your notes on the branches of government. Then copy the web diagram below and use it to show two powers of each branch of
Gathering Information about the Constitution
Look back through what you've just read about the Constitution. Make a list of four or five of the most important features of the Constitution. You'll put that list on the second page of your pamphlet.
6 CHAPTER 6
Biography
James Madison
What would you do to create a
brand-new government?
When did he live? 1751-1836
Where did he live? Like several of the founding fathers, Janies Madison was a Virginian. He grew up in the town of Montpelier, and he kept a home there for his whole life.
What did he do? Through the persuasive power of his writing, Madison helped create the foundations of the U.S. government.
Why is he important? Madison is known as the Father of the Constitution. A brilliant thinker, he provided many of the basic ideas in the Constitution. He argued tirelessly for a strong national government, for separate branches of government, and for rights such as freedom of religion. He then rallied support for adoption of the Constitution and the Bill of Rights. In 1809 Madison became the fourth president of the United States. As president, he led the country through another war with Britain, the War of 1812. He and his wife, Dolley, were forced to flee Washington temporarily when the British invaded the capital and set fire to the White House.
Summarizing Why is Madison known as the Father of the Constitution?
KEY EVENTS
1780
Madison serves in the Continental Congress.
1787
Madison keeps a written record of the Constitutional Convention.
1787-1788
Madison helps write the Federalist Papers, urging support for the Constitution.
1801-1809
Madison serves as secretary of state under President Thomas Jefferson.
1809-1817
Madison serves two terms as president.
James Madison was an important force in the writing of the Constitution.





CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 187
The Constitution of the United States
Preamble
The short and dignified preamble explains the goals of the new government under the Constitution.
e the People of the United States, in Order to form
r r a more perfect Union, establish Justice, insure domestic
l
Tranquility, provide for the common defense, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to
(
ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain
and establish this Constitution for the United States of America.
Note: The parts of the Constitution that have been lined through are no longer in force or no longer apply because of later amendments. The titles of the sections and articles are added for easier reference.
Article I The Legislature
Section 1. ( Congress
All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of the United States, which shall consist of a Senate and House of Representatives.
Section 2. i The House of Representatives
Legislative Branch
Article I explains how the legislative branch, called Congress, is organized.
The chief purpose of the legislative branch is to make laws. Congress is made up of the Senate and the House of Representatives.
The House of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every second Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous Branch of the State Legislature.
1. Elections
2. Qualifications
No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be chosen.
3. Number of Representatives
Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the several States which may be included within this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which shall be determined by adding to the whole Number of free Persons, including those bound to-Servtee1 fo r -a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not taxed, three fifths of all other Persons.2 The actual Enumeration3 shall be made within three Years after the first Meeting of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number of Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each State shall have at Least one Representative^and until such enumeration shall be made, the State of New Hampshire shall
be entitled to-choosc-thrcc, Massachusetts eight, Rhodcdsland and Provi-
dence Plantations one, Connecticut five, New-York six, New-Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland six, Virginia ten, North Caro-
lina five, South Carolina-five, and Georgia three.
The House of Representatives
The number of members each state has in the House is based on the population of the individual state. In 1929 Congress permanently fixed the size of the House at 435 members.
Vocabulary
1	those bound to Service
indentured servants
2	all other Persons slaves
3	Enumeration census or official population count
4. Vacancies
When vacancies happen in the Representation from any State, the Executive Authority thereof shall issue Writs of Election to fill such Vacancies.
The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other Officers; and shall have the sole Power of impeachment.
5. Officers and Impeachment
Section 3. ( The Senate
1. Number of Senators
The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall have one Vote.
2. Classifying Terms
Immediately after they shall be assembled in Consequence of the first Election, they shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may be chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, during the Recess of the Legislature of any
State, the Executive thereof may make temporary Appointments until the
next Meeting of the Legislature, which shall then fill such Vacancies.
3. Qualifications
_________________ No Person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained
to the Age of thirty Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be chosen.
4. Role of Vice President
______________________ The Vice President of the United States shall be President of the Senate, but shall have no Vote, unless they be equally divided.
0ES259 The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also a President pro tempore,4 in the Absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of President of the United States.
6. Impeachment Trials
The Senate shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments.5 When sitting for that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be convicted without the Concurrence of two thirds of the Members present.
7. Punishment for Impeachment
Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Profit under the United States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be liable and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to Law.
Federal Office Terms and Requirements
Position	Term	Minimum Age	Residency	Citizenship
President	4 years	35	14 years in the U.S.	natural-born
Vice President	4 years	35	14 years in the U.S.	natural-born
Supreme Court Justice	unlimited	none	none	none
Senator	6 years	30	state in which elected	9 years
Reoresentative	2 years	25	state in which elected	7 years
Section 4. Congressional Elections
1. Regulations
The Times, Places and Manner of holding Elections for Senators and Representatives, shall be prescribed in each State by the Legislature thereof; but the Congress may at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except as to the Places of choosing Senators.
2. Sessions
The Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year, and Such-Meeting shall be-on-the first Monday in December, unless they shall
by Law appoint a different Day.
Section 5. Rules/Procedures
1. Quorum
Each House shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of its own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum6 to do Business; but a smaller Number may adjourn7 from day to day, and may be authorized to compel the Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner, and under such Penalties as each House may provide.
2. Rules and Conduct
Each House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for disorderly Behaviour, and, with the Concurrence of two thirds, expel a Member.
3. Records
Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time publish the same, excepting such Parts as may in their Judgment require Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on any question shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal.
4. Adjournment
Vocabulary
“Quorum the minimum number of people needed to conduct business ’adjourn to stop indefinitely “Emoluments salary “Continuance term
Neither House, during the Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent of the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other Place than that in which the two Houses shall be sitting.
Section 6. ( Payment
1. Salary
The Senators and Representatives shall receive a Compensation for their Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at the Session of their respective Houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and for any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in any other Place.
2. Restrictions
No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for which he was elected, be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of the United States, which shall have been created, or the Emoluments8 whereof shall have been increased during such time; and no Person holding any Office under the United States, shall be a Member of either House during his Continuance9 in Office.
Vocabulary
10 Bills proposed laws
Section 7. How a Bill Becomes a Law
____________ All Bills10 for raising Revenue shall originate in the House of
Representatives; but the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as on other Bills.
I.Tax Bills
The framers felt that because members of the House are elected every two years, representatives would listen to the public and seek its approval before passing taxes. How does Section 7 address the colonial demand of "no taxation without representation"?
EXPLORING
THE DOCUMENT
Every Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, shall, before it become a Law, be presented to the President of the United States: If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his Objections to that House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be determined by yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for and against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If any Bill shall not be returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment prevent its Return, in which Case it shall not be a Law.
2. Lawmaking
The veto power of the president is one of the important checks and balances in the Constitution. Why do you think the framers included the ability of Congress to override a veto?
EXPLORING
THEDOCUMENT
Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the Same shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill.
3. Role of the President
How a Bill Becomes a Law
3	The House or the Senate debates and votes on its version of the bill.
4	House and Senate conference committee members work out the differences between the two versions.
5	Both houses of Congress pass the revised bill.
Section 8.
Linking to Today
Powers Granted to Congress
1. Taxation
The Congress shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties,11 Imposts12 and Excises,13 to pay the Debts and provide for the common Defense and general Welfare of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be uniform throughout the United States;
To borrow Money on the credit of the United States;
2. Credit
To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several States, and with the Indian Tribes;
3. Commerce
Native Americans and the
Commerce Clause
The commerce clause gives Congress the power to "regulate Commerce with ... the Indian Tribes."The clause has been interpreted to mean that the states cannot tax or interfere with businesses on Indian reservations, but that the federal government can. It also allows American Indian nations to develop their own governments and laws. These laws, however, can be challenged in federal court. Although reservation land usually belongs to the government of the Indian group, it is administered by the U.S. government.
Drawing Conclusions How would you describe the status of American Indian nations underthe commerce clause?
_________________ To establish an uniform Rule of
Naturalization,14 and uniform Laws on the subject of Bankruptcies throughout the United States;
4. Naturalization and Bankruptcy
Vocabulary
11 Duties tariffs
To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the Standard of Weights and Measures;
5. Money
To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities15 and current Coin of the United States;
6. Counterfeiting
7. Post Office
To establish Post Offices and post Roads;
To promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings and Discoveries;
8. Patents and Copyrights
To constitute Tribunals inferior to the supreme Court;
To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and Offences against the Law of Nations;
9. Courts
10. International Law
ANALYSIS MX.'M
SKILLl analyzing Information /
1.	Why do you think the framers created this complex system for adopting laws?
2.	Use this visual display and your background knowledge to define the terms veto, Congress, bill, law, and Congressional committee.
I 12 Imposts taxes
i
13Excises internal taxes on the manufacture, sale, or
I consumption of a commodity
14Rule of Naturalization
a law by which a foreign-born person becomes a citizen 15Securities bonds
6	The president signs or vetoes the bill.
7	Two-thirds majority vote of Congress is needed to approve a vetoed bill. Bill becomes a law.
flilfiffij
Vocabulary
16 Letters of Marque and Reprisal documents issued by governments allowing merchant ships to arm themselves and attack ships of an enemy nation
11. War
To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal,16 and make Rules concerning Captures on Land and Water;
12. Army
To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be for a longer Term than two Years;
13. Navy
14. Regulation of the Military
To provide and maintain a Navy;
To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces;
OPITHTffBi To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, suppress Insurrections and repel Invasions;
16. Regulation of the Militia
To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and for governing such Part of them as may be employed in the Service of the United States, reserving to the States respectively, the Appointment of the Officers, and the Authority of training the Militia according to the discipline prescribed by Congress;
JJJJ2E3ES33333I3SIIEEB
To exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over such District (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular States, and the Acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the Government of the United States, and to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other needful Buildings;—And 18. Necessary and Proper Clause
To make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into Execution the foregoing Powers, and all other Powers vested by this Constitution in the Government of the United States, or in any Department or Officer thereof.
The Elastic Clause


1. Slave Trade
The elastic clause has been stretched (like elastic) to allow Congress to meet changing circumstances.
II..
8«iS!
F...

Section 9. Powers Denied Congress
The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of
the States now existing shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited
by the Congress prior to the Year one thousand eight hundred and-eight,
but a Tax or duty may be imposed on such Importation, not exceeding ten
dollars for each Person.
2. Habeas Corpus
The Privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus17 shall not be suspended, unless when in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require it.
3. Illegal Punishment
No Bill of Attainder18 or ex post facto Law19 shall
be passed.
4. Direct Taxes
No Capitation,20 or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the Census or enumeration herein before directed to be taken.
5. Export Taxes
No Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from
any State.
6. No Favorites
EXPLORING
THEDOCUMENT
No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the Ports of one State over those of another; nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, one State, be obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties in another.
7. Public Money
No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations made by Law; and a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and Expenditures of all public Money shall be published from time to time.
8. Titles of Nobility
Although Congress has implied powers, there are also limits to its powers. Section 9 lists powers that are denied to the federal government. Several of the clauses protect the people of the United States from unjust treatment. In what ways does the Constitution limit the powers of the federal government?
No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And no Person holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind whatever, from any King, Prince, or foreign State.
Section 10. ( Powers Denied the States
1. Restrictions
No State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any Title of Nobility.
2. Import and Export Taxes
No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties on Imports or Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for executing it's inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the United States; and all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control of the Congress.
3. Peacetime and War Restraints
No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any Duty of Tonnage, keep Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact with another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually invaded, or in such imminent Danger as will not admit of delay.
(Vocabulary
17 Writ of Habeas Corpus
a court order that requires the government to bring a prisonerto court and explain why he or she is being held
18Bill of Attainder a law
declaring that a person is guilty of a particular crime
19 ex post facto Law a law
that is made effective prior to the date that it was passed and therefore punishes people for acts that were not illegal at the time
! 20Capitation a direct uniform tax imposed on each head, or person
Executive Branch
Article II The Executive
The president is the chief of the executive branch. It is the job of the president to enforce the laws. The framers wanted the president's and vice president's terms of office and manner of selection to be different from those of members of Congress. They decided on four-year terms, but they had a difficult time agreeing on howto select the president and vice president. The framers finally set up an electoral system, which varies greatly from our electoral process today.
Section 1. 1 The Presidency
1. Terms of Office
The executive Power shall be vested in a President of the United States of America. He shall hold his Office during the Term of four Years, and, together with the Vice President, chosen for the same Term, be elected, as follows:
2. Electoral College
Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives to which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the United States, shall be appointed an Elector.
3.	Former Method of Electing President
The Electors shall meet in their
respective States, and vote by Ballot for two Persons, of whom-onc at least
shall not be an Inhabitant of the same State with themselves. And they
shall-makc a List of-all the Persons voted for, and of the Number of Votes
for each; which List they shall sign and certify; and transmit scaled to the
Scat of the Government of the United States, directed to the President of
the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence of the Senate
and House of Representatives, open all the CcrtificatesT-and the Votes shall
The Electoral College
Number of Electors
MA 12
Washington, D.C. 3
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS! INTERPRETING MAPS

e


HI 4
Place What two states have the most electors?

then be counted. The Person having the greatest Number of Votes-shall be
the President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number-of Elec-
tors appointed; and if there be more than one who have such Majority, and have an equal Number- of Votes, then the House of- Representatives shall
immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person
have a Majority, then from the five highest en-thc List the said House shall
in like Manner choose- the President. But in choosing the President, the
Votes shall be taken by States, the Representation-from each State having
one Vote; A quorum for this purpose shall consist of a Member-er Mem-
bers from two thirds of the States, and a Majority of all the States shall be ncccssary-to a Choice. In every Case;-after the Choiee of the President, the
Person having the greatest Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice
President: But if thcre-should remain two or more -who have equal Votes,
the Senate shall choose fronethem-by Ballot the Vice President.
4. Election Day
The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the United States.
5. Qualifications
No Person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at the time of the Adoptien-ef-this Constitution, shall
be eligible to the Office of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty five Years, and been fourteen Years a Resident within the United States.
6. Succession
In Case of the Removal of the President from Office, or of his Death, Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties of the said Office, the Same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may by Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of the President and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then act as President, and such Officer shall act accordingly, until the Disability be removed, or a President shall be elected.
7. Salary
The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for which he shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other Emolument from the United States, or any of them.
8. Oath of Office
Before he enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall take the following Oath or Affirmation:—"I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of President of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States."
Commander in Chief
Today the president is in charge of the army, navy, air force, marines, and coast guard. Only Congress, however, can decide if the United States will declare war.
Section 2
Powers of Presidency
1. Military Powers
The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United States, and of the Militia of the several States, when called into the actual Service of the United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the principal Officer in each of the executive Departments, upon any Subject relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to grant Reprieves21 and Pardons22 for Offences against the United States, except in Cases of Impeachment.
2. Treaties and Appointments
He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court, and all other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are not herein otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by Law: but the Congress may by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of Departments.
3. Vacancies
The President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End of their next Session.
Section 3.
Presidential Duties
He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the Union, and recommend to their Consideration such Measures as he shall judge necessary and expedient; he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, with Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn L'pm to such Time as he shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all the Officers of the United States.
Section 4. Impeachment
The President, Vice President and all civil Officers of the United States, shall be removed from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, Bribery, or other high Crimes and Misdemeanors.
The Judiciary
Article III
Section 1. ( Federal Courts and Judges
The judicial Power of the United States shall be vested in one supreme Court, and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain and establish. The Judges, both of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold their Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive for their Services a Compensation, which shall not be diminished during their Continuance in Office.
Section 2. ( Authority of the Courts
1. General Authority
The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under this Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and Treaties made, or which shall be made, under their Authority;—to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls;—to all Cases of admiralty and maritime Jurisdiction;—to Controversies to which the United States shall be a Party;—to Controversies between two or more States —between a State and Citizens of another State; —between Citizens of different States;—between Citizens of the same State claiming Lands under Grants of different States, and between a State, or the Citizens thereof, and foreign States; Citizens or Subjects.
2. Supreme Authority
In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, and those in which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and under such Regulations as the Congress shall make.
Federal Judicial System
Supreme Court
Reviews cases appealed from lower federal courts and highest state courts
f
Courts of Appeals
Review appeals from district courts
District Courts
Hold trials
The States
States must honor the laws, records, and court decisions of other states. A person cannot escape a legal obligation by moving from one state to another.
3. Trial by Jury
The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and such Trial shall be held in the State where the said Crimes shall have been committed; but when not committed within any State, the Trial shall be at such Place or Places as the Congress may by Law have directed.
Section 3.
Treason
----------—/
Treason against the United States, shall consist only in levying War against them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the same overt Act, or on Confession in open Court.
The Congress shall have Power to declare the Punishment
of Treason, but no Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood,23 or Forfeiture except during the Life of the Person attainted.
1. Definition
2. Punishment
Article IV | Relations among States
Section 1. ( State Acts and Records
Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress may by general Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be proved, and the Effect thereof.
Section 2. ( Rights of Citizens
The framers wanted to ensure that citizens could determine how state governments would operate. How does the need to respect the laws of each state support the principle of popular sovereignty?
EXPLORING
THEOOCUMENT
The Citizens of each State shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities of Citizens in the several States.
1. Citizenship
A
Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall flee from Justice, and be found in another State, shall on Demand of the executive Authority of the State from which he fled, be delivered up, to be removed to the State having Jurisdiction of the Crime. 2. Extradition
No Person held to Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law
or RegulationTherem, be discharged from such Service or Labour, but shall
be delivered up on-Claim of the Party to-whom such Service or Labour may
be due?
3. Fugitive Slaves
Federalisrnf^'J*
National		State	1
Declare war	J	Shared Wk	• Establish and maintain schools
Maintain armed forces	Jr		• Establish local governments
Regulate interstate and g	Maintain law	w| and order	i	k • Regulate business within
foreign trade	g		B	the state
Admit new states	9	Levy taxes	1	IK • Make marriage laws
Establish post offices IB	Borrow money	|B • Provide for public safety
	Charter banks	1	• Assume other powers not
Set standard weights ®		
and measures	IB *	Establish courts |	B	delegated to the national
Coin money	’	Provide for	ji	F	government nor prohibited
Establish foreign policy	public welfare Jar	to the states
Make all laws necessary and propSlk	Jjr		
for carrying out delegated powers		
ANALYSIS
SKILLiANALYZING INFORMATION
Why does the power to declare war belong only to the national government?
1. Admission
Section 3. ( New States
.. .....J.......V
New States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new State shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction
of any other State; nor any State be formed by the Junction of two or more States, or Parts of States, without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of the Congress.
2. Congressional Authority
The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property belonging to the United States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice any Claims of the United States, or of any particular State.
Section 4. { Guarantees to the States
The United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature cannot be convened), against domestic Violence.
In a republic, voters elect representatives to act in their best interest. How
does Article IV protect the practice of republicanism in the United States?
EXPLORING
THEOOCUMENT
3
America's founders may not have realized how long the Constitution would last, but they did set up a system for changing or adding to it. They did not want to make it easy to change the Constitution. By what methods may the Constitution be amended? Under what sorts of circumstances do you think an amendment might be necessary?
EXPLORING
THEDOCUMENT
Article V ) Amending the Constitution
The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall propose Amendments to this Constitution, or, on the Application of the Legislatures of two thirds of the several States, shall call a Convention for proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid to all Intents and Purposes, as Part of this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of three fourths of the several States, or by Conventions in three fourths thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior to the Year One thousand eight hundred and eight shall in-any Manner
affect the first and-fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and
that no State, without its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in
the Senate.
National Supremacy
One of the biggest problems facing the delegates to the Constitutional Convention was the question of what would happen if a state law and a federal law conflicted. Which law would be followed? Who would decide? The second clause of Article VI answers those questions. When a federal law and a state law disagree, the federal law overrides the state law. The Constitution and other federal laws are the "supreme Law of the Land." This clause is often called the supremacy clause.
Article VI
Supremacy of National Government
All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be as valid against the United States under this Constitution, as under the Confederation.
This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which shall be made in Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall be made, under the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Laws of any State to the Contrary notwithstanding.
The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the Members of the several State Legislatures, and all executive and judicial Officers, both of the United States and of the several States, shall be bound by Oath or Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever be required as a Qualification to any Office or public Trust under the United States.
JJoiar Amending the "CT* U.S. Constitution
Amendments can be proposed by Congress
? ""t
or
National
Convention
.w
with a two-thirds vote in each house
Legislatures
ofthree-fourths ofthe states
called by Congress at the request of two-thirds ofthe state legislatures
Ratified by
or
Conventions
in three-fourths ofthe states
Amendment is added
Article VII Ratification
»»■.......
The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for the Establishment of this Constitution between the States so ratifying the Same.
Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the States present the Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United States of America the Twelfth In witness whereof We have hereunto subscribed our Names,
George Washington—
President and deputy from Virginia
Delaware
George Read Gunning Bedford Jr. John Dickinson Richard Bassett Jacob Broom
Maryland
James McHenry Daniel of
St. Thomas Jenifer Daniel Carroll
Virginia
John Blair James Madison Jr.
North Carolina
William Blount Richard Dobbs Spaight Hugh Williamson
South Carolina
John Rutledge Charles Cotesworth
Pinckney Charles Pinckney Pierce Butler
Georgia
William Few Abraham Baldwin
New Hampshire
John Langdon Nicholas Gilman
Massachusetts
Nathaniel Gorham Rufus King
Connecticut
William Samuel Johnson Roger Sherman
New York
Alexander Hamilton
New Jersey
William Livingston David Brearley William Paterson Jonathan Dayton
Pennsylvania
Benjamin Franklin Thomas Mifflin Robert Morris George Clymer Thomas FitzSimons Jared Ingersoll James Wilson Gouvemeur Morris
Attest:
William Jackson, Secretary
Ratification
Bill of Rights
One of the conditions set by several states for ratifying the Constitution was the inclusion of a bill of rights. Many people feared that a stronger central government might take away basic rights of the people that had been guaranteed in state constitutions.
The First Amendment forbids Congress from making any "law respecting an establishment of religion" or restraining the freedom to practice religion as one chooses. Why is freedom of religion an important right?
EXPLORING
THE DOCUMENT
Rights of the Accused
The Fifth, Sixth, and Seventh Amendments describe the procedures that courts must follow when trying people accused of crimes.
Constitutional Amendments
Note: The first 10 amendments to the Constitution were ratified on December 15,1791, and form what is known as the Bill of Rights.
j Amendments 1 -10. The Bill of Rights
Amendment I
Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.
Amendment II
A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed.
Amendment III
No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered24 in any house, without the consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by law.
Amendment IV
The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no Warrants25 shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.
Amendment V
No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous26 crime, unless on a presentment or indictment27 of a Grand Jury, except in
Vocabulary
24 quartered housed
“Warrants written orders authorizing a person to make an arrest, a seizure, or a search
“infamous disgraceful
27 indictment the act of charging with a crime
ANALYSIS
SKILL! ANALYZING INFORMATION
cases arising in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offence to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be taken for public use, without just compensation. Amendment VI
In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime shall have been committed, which district shall have been previously ascertained28 by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of Counsel for his defence.
Amendment VII
In suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a jury, shall be otherwise reexamined in any Court of the United States, than according to the rules of the common law.
Amendment VIII
Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted.
Amendment IX
The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed to deny or disparage others retained by the people.
Amendment X
The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to the people.
Which amendment guarantees these fundamental freedoms?

1795 Amendment 11
Protects the states from lawsuits filed by citizens of other states or countries
Amendments to the U.S. Constitution
The Constitution has been amended only 27 times since it was ratified more than 200 yearsago. Amendments help the structure of the government change along with the values of the nation's people* Read the time line below to learn how each amendment changed the government.
1870 Amendment 15
Prohibits national and state governments from denying the vote based on race
1791
Bill of Rights
Amendments 1-10
1804
Amendment 12
Requires separate ballots for the offices of president and vice president
1865
Amendment 13
Bans slavery
1868
Amendment 14
Defines citizenship and citizens' rights
Amendments 11-27
Amendment XI
Passed by Congress March 4,1794. Ratified February 7,1795.
The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed29 to extend to any suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State.
Amendment XII
Passed by Congress December 9,1803. Ratified June 15,1804.
The Electors shall meet in their respective states and vote by ballot for President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and of the number of votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to the seat of the government of the United States, directed to the President of the Senate;—the President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the
1915
Amendment 18
Bans the making, selling, and shipping of alcoholic beverages
1920
Amendment 19
Extends the right to vote to women
1933
Amendment 21
Repeals Amendment 18
1961
Amendment 23
Gives citizens of Washington, D.C., the right to vote in presidential elections
1964
Amendment 24
Bans poll taxes
1971
Amendment 26
Gives 18-year-olds the right to vote in federal and state elections
1913
Amendment 16
Allows Congress to tax incomes
Amendment 17
Establishes the direct election of U.S. senators
1933
Amendment 20
Changes the date for starting a new congressional term and inaugurating a new president
1951
Amendment 22
Limits terms a president can serve to two
1967
Amendment 25
Establishes procedures for presidential succession
ANALYSIS
SKILL! READING TIME LINES
1992
Amendment 27
Limits the ability of Congress to increase its pay
1.	How are the Eighteenth and Twenty-first Amendments related?
2.	Which amendments relate to the right to vote?
Senate and House of Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall then be counted;—The person having the greatest number of votes for President, shall be the President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from the persons having the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted for as President, the House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by states, the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for this purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House of Rcprcscntativcs-shall not ehoose a President whenever the right of choice shalTdcvolvc upon them,
before the fourth day of March next following, then the Vice-President
shall act as President, as in case of the death or other constitutional disabil-
ity of the President.—The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible to that of Vice-President of the United States.
Although some slaves had been freed during the Civil War, slavery was not abolished until the Thirteenth Amendment took effect.
Amendment XIII
Passed by Congress January31,1865. Ratified December 6,1865.
J3E333EESSBBSB
Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude,30 except as a punishment for crime whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United States, or any place subject to their jurisdiction. EGS3E3I03
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Protecting the Rights of Citizens
In 1833 the Supreme Court ruled that the Bill of Rights limited the federal government but not the state governments. This ruling was interpreted to mean that states were able to keep African Americans from becoming state citizens and keep the Bill of Rights from protecting them. The Fourteenth Amendment defines citizenship and prevents states from interfering in the rights of citizens ofthe United States.
Vocabulary
30 involuntary servitude
being forced to work against one's will
Amendment XIV
Passed by Congress June 13,1866. Ratified July 9,1868.
J05B3B3SSffl2EiS35aEB AU persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.
a^Bj3EES3EEBS3SB Representatives shall be apportioned among the several States according to their respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons in each State, excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for the choice of electors for President and Vice-President of the United States, Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of a State, or the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the United States, or in any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear to the whole number of male citizens twenty-one years of age in such State.
:O0jL3aHSDBESaSBE3DG51I3EEr!SJaS3SCS3l No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military, under the United States, or under any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a member of any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any State, to support the Constitution of the United States, shall have engaged in insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort to the enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove such disability.
OJ25JJ05J5I2333SI
The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, including debts incurred for payment of pensions and 2. Enforcement
ANALYSIS
SKILL!
Analyzing information Why was the Thirteenth Amendment needed?
The Congress shall have the power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
The Reconstruction Amendments
The Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth Amendments are often called the Reconstruction Amendments.This is because they arose during Reconstruction, the period of American history following the Civil War. The country was reconstructing itself after that terrible conflict. A key aspect of Reconstruction was extending the rights of citizenship to former slaves.
The Thirteenth Amendment banned slavery.The Fourteenth Amendment required states to respect the freedoms listed in the Bill of Rights, thus preventing states from denying rights to African Americans. The Fifteenth Amendment gave African American men the right to vote.

bounties for services in suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither the United States nor any State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and claims shall be held illegal and void.
Gu3SS33Snu33 The Congress shall have the power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the provisions of this article.
Amendment XV
Passed by Congress February26,1869. Ratified February3,1870.
The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of race, color, or previous condition of servitude.
Amendment requires that senators be elected directly by the people instead of by the state legislatures. What principle of our government does the Seventeenth Amendment protect?
Amendment XVI
Passed by Congress July2,1909. Ratified February 3,1913.
The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from whatever source derived, without apportionment among the several States, and without regard to any census or enumeration.
I
Amendment XVII
Passed by Congress May 13,1912. Ratified April 8,1913.
The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each State, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall have one vote. The electors in each State shall have the qualifications requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the State legislatures.
When vacancies happen in the representation of any State in the Senate, the executive authority of such State shall issue writs of election to fill such vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of any State may empower the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the people fill the vacancies by election as the legislature may direct.
COSS33S3S3EI
This amendment shall nothe so construed as to affect the election or term of any Senator chosen before it bceomes-valid as part of the Constitution.
Prohibition
Although many people believed that the Eighteenth Amendment was good for the health and welfare of the American people, it was repealed 14 years later.
Amendment XVIII
Passed by Congress December 18,1917. Ratified January 16,1919. Repealed by AmendmentXXI.
1. Liquor Banned
After one year from the ratification-of-this-article the manufacture, sale, or transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the
importation thereof into, or the exportation thereof from the United States
and all territory subject to the jurisdiction-thereof for beverage purposes-is
hereby prohibited.
GEE3SSSS33S9
The Congress and- the several States-shall have concurrent power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. 3. Ratification
This article shall be-inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the
several States, as provided in the Constitution, within seven-years from the
date of the submission hereof to the States by the Congress.-
To become part of the Constitution, a proposed amendment must be ratified by three-fourths of the states. Here, suffragists witness Kentucky governor Edwin P. Morrow signing the Nineteenth Amendment in January 1920. By June of that year, enough states had ratified the amendment to make it part of the Constitution. American women, after generations of struggle, had finally won the right to vote.
Amendment XIX
Passed by Congress June 4,1919. Ratified August 18,1920.
The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of sex.
GuSuSaEuSSul Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment XX
Passed by Congress March 2,1932. Ratified January23,1933.
■AilJggQSSoUMlSul The terms of the President and the Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, of the years in which such terms would have ended if this article had not been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then begin.
2. Meeting of Congress
The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint a different day.
^J333S33ES»3ESSSZSdS333I If, af the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the President elect shall have died, the Vice President elect shall become President. If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein neither a President elect nor a Vice President shall have qualified, declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President or Vice President shall have qualified.
(0^E3SSSS2GES5E2SDfiEQB5SS3SSI The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any of the persons from whom the House of Representatives may choose a President whenever the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President whenever the right of choice shall have devolved upon them.
QSB
Sections 1 and 2 shall take effecton-thc ISth-day of October following the ratification of this article.- CSSSjSSED This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the several States within seven years from the date of its submission.
Amendment XXI
Passed by Congress February20,1933. Ratified December5,1933.
The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the United States is hereby repealed.
The transportation or importation into any State, Territory, or Possession of the United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in violation of the laws thereof, is hereby prohibited.
®EEEB53DI This article shall-be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the sev-
eral States, as provided in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the submission hereof-to the States by the Congress.
Amendment XXII
Passed by Congress March 21,1947. Ratified February27,1951.
I.Term Limits
EXPLORING
THE DOCUMENT
No person shall be elected to the office of the President more than twice, and no person who has held the office of President, or acted as President, for more than two years of a term to which some other person was elected President shall be elected to the office of President more than once. But this Article shall not apply to any person holding the office of President when this Article was-proposed by Congress, and shall not
prevent any person who may be holding the office of-President, or acb
ing as President, during the term within which this Article becomes opera-
tive from holding the office of-Prestdcnt-er acting as President during the remainder of such term.
2. Ratification
This-articic shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-
feurths-erf the-several States within seven years from the date of its submis-
sion to the States by the Congress.
From the time of President George Washington's administration, it was a custom for presidents to serve no more than two terms in office. Franklin D. Roosevelt, however, was elected to four terms. The Twenty-second Amendment restricted presidents to no more than two terms in office. Why do you think citizens chose to limit the power of the president in this way?
After Franklin D. Roosevelt was elected to four consecutive terms, limits were placed on the number of terms a president could serve.
Amendment XXIII
Passed by Congress June 16,1960. Ratified March 29,1961.
OuCcSHSSSSSSElEBCESESuMlISSQSSaBQsEiV The District constituting the seat of Government of the United States shall appoint in such manner as Congress may direct:
A number of electors of President and Vice President equal to the whole number of Senators and Representatives in Congress to which the District would be entitled if it were a State, but in no event more than the least populous State; they shall be in addition to those appointed by the States, but they shall be considered, for the purposes of the election of President and Vice President, to be electors appointed by a State; and they shall meet in the District and perform such duties as provided by the twelfth article of amendment.
BBuZSBSSSSl The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Voting Rights
Until the ratification of the Twenty-third Amendment, the people of Washington, D.C., could not vote in presidential elections.
1
Poll taxes were used to deny many poor Americans, including African Americans and ; Hispanic Americans, their right to vote. These taxes were made unconstitutional by the Twenty-fourth 3 Amendment. At right, an African American woman in Alabama votes for the first time.
Poll Tax Amendment


sHHSj;
SKILL) ANALYZING INFORMATION
How did poll taxes deny poor Americans the opportunity to vote?
Amendment XXIV
Presidential Disability
The illness of President Eisenhower in the 1950s and the assassination of President Kennedy in 1963 were the events behind the Twenty-fifth Amendment. The Constitution did not provide a clear-cut method for a vice president to take over for a disabled president or upon the death of a president. This amendment provides for filling the office ofthe vice president if a vacancy occurs, and it provides a way for the vice president—or someone else in the line of succession—to take over if the president is unable to perform the duties of that office.
Passed by Congress August27,1962. Ratified January23,1964.
^JBBBSESaSEEQSSSSB The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other election for President or Vice President, for electors for President or Vice President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or any State by reason of failure to pay poll tax or other tax.
CECEQSE83SSS9
The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Amendment XXV
Passed by Congress July6,1965. Ratified February 10,1967.
case °f the removal of the President from office or of his death or resignation, the Vice President shall become President.
Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the President shall nominate a Vice President who shall take office upon confirmation by a majority vote of both Houses of Congress.
3. Written Declaration
Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until he transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties shall be discharged by the Vice President as Acting President.
4. Removing the President
Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting President.
Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office unless the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers of the executive department or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty-eight hours for that purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty-one days after receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, within twenty-one days after Congress is required to assemble, determines by two-thirds vote of both Houses that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers and duties of his office.
Amendment XXVI
Passed by Congress March 23,1971. Ratified July 1,1971.
1. Voting Rights
The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of age.
EESSESIISliJ The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment XXVII
Originally proposed September25,1789. Ratified May 7,1992.
No law, varying the compensation for the services of the Senators and Representatives, shall take effect, until an election of representatives shall have intervened.
What You Will Learn...
1.	The First Amendment guarantees basic freedoms to individuals.
2.	Other amendments focus on protecting citizens from certain abuses.
3.	The rights of the accused are an important part of the Bill of Rights.
4.	The rights of states and citizens are protected by the Bill of Rights.
The Bill of Rights
If YOU were there...
Your father runs a bookshop in colonial Boston in 1770. Your family lives in a very small brick house. You and your sisters must share one small room. One day, a red-coated British officer knocks on your door and strides into the parlor. He says that your family will have to provide a room and meals for two British soldiers. "We're already crowded!"you protest, but he insists.
Would you support the British government’s requirement that colonists provide food and shelter for troops? Why?
The Bill of Rights was added to the Constitution to define clearly the rights and freedoms of citizens.
K BUILDING BACKGROUND
People in the American colonies I resented the British soldiers stationed in their towns. They objected to i sudden searches and to soldiers being housed in private homes. They disliked censorship of their newspapers. When the Constitution was written, Americans remembered those wrongs. They insisted on adding a bill of rights to the document.
Key Terms and People
James Madison, p. 216 majority rule, p. 216 petition, p. 217 search warrant, p. 218 due process, p. 218 indict, p. 218 double jeopardy, p. 218 eminent domain, p. 218
hmhsocialstudies.com
I TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the freedoms protected by the Bill of Rights and which amendment protects each.
First Amendment
Federalist James Madison promised that a bill of rights would be added to the Constitution. This promise allowed the Constitution to pass. In 1789 Madison began writing a huge list of proposed amendments. He then presented a shorter list to the House of Representatives. Of those, the House approved 12. The states ratified 10, which took effect December 15, 1791. Those 10 amendments, called the Bill of Rights, protect U.S. citizens' individual liberties. Some of the amendments specifically address complaints mentioned in the Declaration of Independence.
The protection of individual liberties is important in a representative democracy. Without safeguards, people's rights would not always be protected because of majority rule. This is the idea that the greatest number of people in society can make policies for everyone. While this means that most people agree on what the law should be, it also means that smaller groups, or minorities, might lose their rights. The Bill of Rights ensures that the rights of all citizens are protected.

16 CHAPTER 6
The ideas spelled out in the First Amendment form the most basic rights of all U.S. citizens. These rights include freedom of religion, freedom of the press, freedom of speech, freedom of assembly, and the right to petition.
In the spirit of Thomas Jefferson's Virginia Statute for Religious Freedom, the First Amendment begins, "Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof." In other words, the government cannot support or interfere with the practice of a religion. This amendment keeps the government from favoring one religion over any other or establishing an official religion.
The First Amendment also guarantees freedom of speech and of the press. This means that Americans have the right to express their own ideas and views. They also have the right to hear the ideas and views of others. Former senator Margaret Chase Smith discussed why these freedoms are important. "The key to security," she once said, "is public information."
Freedom of speech does not mean that people can say anything they want to, how-
1
Amendment I
Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.
ever. The Constitution does not protect slander—false statements meant to damage someone's reputation. Libel, or intentionally writing a lie that harms another person, is not protected, either. The Supreme Court has also ruled that speech that endangers public safety is not protected. For example, Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes declared in 1919 that falsely shouting "Fire" in a crowded theater is not protected as free speech.
Americans also have freedom of assembly. Any group may gather peacefully. As long as they do not engage in illegal activities, the government cannot interfere. The right to petition, or make a request of the government, is another right of the American people. Any American can present a petition to a government official. This right lets Americans show dissatisfaction with a law. They can also suggest new laws. One of the reasons the Declaration of Independence gave for breaking with Britain was King George Ill's refusal to respond to petitions sent by colonists.
Reading Check
the impact!
TODAY
Free-speech protection has also been applied to "symbolic" speech—or nonverbal communication that expresses an idea, such as wearing a protest button.
Summarizing What rights does the First Amendment guarantee to Americans?
Workers use the right of assembly to protest a proposed budget in New York City.
Amendment II
A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed.
Amendment III
No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in any house, without the consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by law.
Amendment IV
The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.
to having their property searched for illegal goods. Anger over such actions led to the Fourth Amendment rule against “unreasonable searches and seizures." Before a citizen's property can be searched, authorities must now get a search warrant. This order gives authorities permission to search someone's property. A judge issues this order only when it seems likely that a search might uncover evidence relating to a crime. In emergencies, however, police can make an emergency search. This may preserve evidence needed to prove possible illegal activity.
READING CHECK
Finding Main Ideas
Why were the Third and Fourth Amendments matters of great importance to Americans when the Bill of Rights was written?
Protecting Citizens
The Second, Third, and Fourth Amendments relate to colonial disputes with Britain and reflect many of the ideals outlined in the Declaration of Independence. The Second Amendment deals with state militias and the right to bear arms. Colonial militias played a big role in the Revolutionary War. The framers of the Constitution thought that the states needed their militias for emergencies. Today the National Guard has largely replaced organized state militias.
Supporters of gun-control laws have generally argued that the Second Amendment was intended to protect the collective right of states to maintain well-regulated militia units. Opponents hold that the amendment was meant to protect an individual's right of self-defense. The meaning of the amendment continues to be debated.
The Third Amendment prevents the military from forcing citizens to house soldiers. Before the Revolution, the British pressured colonists to shelter and feed British soldiers, a practice colonists protested in the Declaration of Independence. British leaders also forced colonists to submit
Rights of the Accused
The Fifth, Sixth, Seventh, and Eighth Amendments provide guidelines for protecting the rights of the accused. According to the Fifth Amendment, the government cannot punish anyone without due process of law. This means that the law must be fairly applied. A grand jury decides if there is enough evidence to indict (en—dyt), or formally accuse, a person. Without an indictment, the court cannot try anyone for a serious crime. The Fifth Amendment also protects people from having to testify at their own criminal trial. To keep from testifying, a person need only "take the Fifth." In addition, anyone found not guilty in a criminal trial cannot face double jeopardy. In other words, he or she cannot be tried again for the same crime.
The final clause of the Fifth Amendment states that no one can have property taken without due process of law. There is one exception: the government's power of eminent domain. This is the power to take personal property to benefit the public. One example would be taking private land to build a public road. However, the government must pay the owners a fair price for the property.
CHAPTER 6
The Sixth Amendment protects the rights of a person who has been indicted. Under British rule, colonists were sometimes held in jail for long periods or taken to Britain before being brought to trial. The British government also prevented some accused of crimes from having a jury trial. The Declaration of Independence listed these and other interferences with trials as a reason for rebelling against Britain. The Sixth Amendment guarantees an indicted person a speedy public trial. Public trials ensure that laws are followed by allowing the public to witness the proceedings. Accused people have the right to know the charges against them and can hear and question witnesses who testify against them. Accused people have the right to an attorney. If they cannot pay for one, the government must provide it. Sometimes accused persons refuse their Sixth Amendment rights. For example, some defendants refuse the services of an attorney, while others choose to have a trial in front of a judge alone instead of before a jury. In many cases, defendants can forgo trial and agree to a plea bargain. This means that a defendant pleads guilty to a lesser charge and avoids risking conviction for a crime with a greater sentence.
The Seventh Amendment states that juries can decide civil cases. It is possible to harm another person without committing a crime.
In such cases, the injured party may sue, or seek justice, in a civil court. Civil cases usually involve disputes over money or property. For example, someone might bring a civil suit against a person who refuses to repay a debt.
Amendment V
No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offence to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be taken for public use, without just compensation.
Amendment VI
In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime shall have been committed, which district shall have been previously ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of Counsel for his defence.
Amendment VII
In suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a jury, shall be otherwise reexamined in any Court of the United States, than according to the rules of the common law.
A judge and jury listen to attorneys and witnesses from each side of a court case to determine a verdict.
citWiship and the constitution 219




Amendment VIII
Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted.
A
Right to Bail The Eighth Amendment allows for bail. Bail is a set amount of money that defendants promise to pay the court if they fail to appear in court at the proper time.
By posting, or paying, bail, a defendant can avoid staying in jail before and during a trial. If a defendant does not show up in court for trial, the court demands the bail money be paid and issues a warrant for arrest.
The Eighth Amendment keeps courts from setting unfairly high bail. However, in cases of very serious crimes, a judge may refuse to set bail altogether. This can be the case, for example, if the court regards a j defendant as being potentially • dangerous to the public by j being left free. A judge can also deny bail if he or she thinks the defendant will not show up for trial. In such cases the | defendant must remain in jail through the trial.
FOCUS ON
Reading Summarize the Bill of Rights.
"Cruel and Unusual Punishments"
The Eighth Amendment also bans "cruel and unusual punishments" against a person convicted of a crime. For many years, Americans have debated the question of what exactly constitutes cruel and unusual punishment. The debate has often centered on the issue of capital punishment. In 1972 the Supreme Court ruled that the way in which most states carried out the death penalty was cruel and unusual. The Court also found that the ways in which many states sentenced people to death were unfair. However, a few years later, the Court ruled that not all executions were in themselves cruel and unusual.
Most states still allow the death penalty. Those that do must follow the Supreme Court's rules. To do so, many states have changed the ways in which they carry out the death penalty.
READING CHECK ,
Summarizing What is the purpose ofthe Eighth Amendment?
Rights of States and Citizens
The final two amendments in the Bill of Rights give a general protection for other rights not addressed by the first eight amendments. These amendments also reserve some governmental powers for the states and the people.
Ninth Amendment
The Ninth Amendment says that the rights listed in the Constitution are not the only rights that citizens have. This amendment has allowed the courts and Congress to decide other basic rights of citizens.
The Constitution does not address the question of education. However, most Americans believe that it is a basic and essential right. This seems especially true in view of the fact that American citizens must be able to vote for the people who represent them in government. "Education is not just another
Amendment IX
The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed to deny or disparage others retained by the people.
Amendment X
The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to the people.
'0 CHAPTER 6
consumer item. It is the bedrock [foundation] of our democracy," explained educational leader Mary Hatwood Futrell. Today state governments offer free education from elementary to high school—to all citizens.
Tenth Amendment
The Tenth Amendment recognizes that the states and the people have additional powers. These powers are any ones that the Constitution does not specifically give to Congress—the delegated powers. The Tenth Amendment makes it clear that any powers not either delegated to the federal government or prohibited to the states belong to the states and the people. Thus, the last amendment in the Bill of Rights protects citizens' rights and helps keep the balance of power between the federal and state governments.
Section 2 Assessment
-x hmhsocialstudies.com
Reading Check
Summarizing How does the
Tenth Amendment protect the rights of citizens?
AND PREVIEW
In this section ■ you learned about the Bill of Rights. In the next section you will learn about the responsibilities of citizenship.
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
1.	a. Identify What basic rights are protected by the First Amendment?
b.	Explain What does the right to petition the government mean?
c.	Elaborate Why is freedom ofthe press an important right?
2.	a. Describe How are citizens protected under the Third and Fourth Amendments?
b. Draw Conclusions In what ways did British actions before the Revolution lead to the Second, Third, and Fourth Amendments?
3.	a. Identify What protections does the Eighth Amendment provide for people accused of crimes?
b. Elaborate Why is it important that the Bill of Rights protects people accused of crimes?
4.	a. Recall What is the purpose ofthe final two amendments in the Bill of Rights?
b. Analyze How does the Tenth Amendment balance power between national and state governments?
Critical Thinking
5.	Summarizing Copy the chart below. Use it to summarize the rights guaranteed to citizens by each amendment in the Bill of Rights.
Students learn about the rights and responsibilities of being a U.S. citizen.
Amendment	Rights
1	
2	
3	
4	
5	
6	
7	
8	
9	
10	
'"J'WriteSmart
6.	Gathering Information about the Bill of Rights
What freedoms are guaranteed by the Bill of Rights?
Make a list ofthe most important freedoms. You'll list those freedoms on the third page of your pamphlet.
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 221
On September 17, Constitution Day, Americans celebrate the signing of the United States Constitution in 1787. In Texas, social studies classrooms also observe Celebrate Freedom Week. This important celebration focuses on the meaning and significance of the two foundational documents in United States history—the Declaration of Independence and the U.S. Constitution.
The Declaration of Independence
One of the most eloquent and influential documents ever written, the Declaration of Independence gave the reasons the American colonies were willing to fight for independence. Thomas Jefferson, the main author of the document, began by explaining the purpose of government. Part of this first section, known as the Preamble, must be recited by Texas students during Celebrate Freedom Week. It is perhaps the most famous statement from the document:
These powerful words established the idea that governments exist to serve their citizens, and that people have basic natural rights that government cannot take away. Throughout our history, these words have inspired Americans to fight for and expand the definitions of freedom, equality, and basic rights. For example, women's rights advocates echoed the language of the Declaration of Independence in 1848 when they demanded the right to vote by declaring that "all men and women are created equal." Abolitionists and civil rights leaders also looked to the Declaration of Independence in their struggles to end slavery and ensure that African Americans were guaranteed equal rights. Even beyond America, the Declaration of Independence has inspired independence and prodemocracy movements around the world. It continues to inspire us today.
Independence Day
Each 4th of July, Americans celebrate the adoption of the Declaration of Independence with parades, fireworks, picnics, fairs, and ceremonies honoring our freedoms and government.
We hold these Truths to be self-evident, that all Men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Happiness. That to secure these Rights, Governments are instituted among Men, deriving their just Powers from the Consent of the Governed.
KEY FACTS

—Declaration of Independence

I
1

In CONGRESS, Jrar,..7X-'ecfawrtott
DECLARATION OF INDEPENDENCE
Date
•	Adopted July 4,1776 by the Continental Congress
Key Author
•	Thomas Jefferson
Intent
•	To announce formally that the 13 American colonies considered themselves independent states no longer part of the British Empire
•	To explain and justify the reasons for independence
Meaning and Importance
•	Established in writing the principle that all people have certain fundamental rights that no government can take away
•	Explained that the purpose of government is to serve citizens
•	Influenced the U.S. Constitution and Bill of Rights
•	Has inspired people throughout history in the struggle for equality, justice, and basic human rights



-	y..................- - -	-	- -	*
I	wMu At* &i
• AdhAf A	of9^aA
ii « awn l
!
!
I

The U.S. Constitution
Building on the Declaration of Independence, the U.S. Constitution established the system of government that is still in effect today. Another truly groundbreaking document, the Constitution established the rule of law and made clear that no one, including the highest government official, is above it. The document's opening words, the Preamble, elegantly state its purpose:
I/Ve the People of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide for the common defense, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the United States of America.
—United States Constitution
The three opening words, IVe the People, which were written so much larger than the others, announced dramatically that in the United States the people are the source of all government power and authority.
To protect people's rights and to balance power, the Constitution set up a system that divides power among federal and state governments. Federal power is supreme, and certain powers are shared or reserved for the states. A system of checks and balances further divides power among three equal branches of government—legislative, executive, and judicial.
The Constitution also includes a process by which it can be amended, or changed. It is sometimes referred to as "a living document" for this reason; it can be added to and improved by the people to reflect changes in society. Since it was adopted in 1787, the Constitution has been amended 27 times. These amendments have abolished slavery, guaranteed women and minorities the right to vote and to receive equal treatment under the law, changed voting and election procedures, and made other improvements to our government.
One of the most important parts of the Constitution is the Bill of Rights—the first 10 amendments. The Bill of Rights helps protect the rights described in the Declaration of Independence. For example, the Bill of Rights protects such basic rights as freedom of speech, press, and religion as well as due process rights such as the right to a fair trial. The Bill of Rights was an important early addition to the Constitution because it stated in writing some of the specific individual rights and protections guaranteed for all Americans.
KEY FACTS
BILL OF RIGHTS
THE CONSTITUTION
Date
•	Adopted September 17,1787 by the Constitutional Convention
Key Author
•	James Madison
Intent
•	To establish a new national government of the United States
•	To replace the Articles of Confederation
•	To safeguard the freedoms of all Americans, present and future
Meaning and Importance
•	Established the supreme law of the land for the United States that is still in effect today
•	Identifies the people as the ultimate source of government power
•	Sets up a system of power sharing among the federal and state government
•	Divides power into three equal branches of government
•	Includes an amendment process
•	Includes the Bill of Rights and other amendments that have protected and expanded individual rights and freedoms
1st Amendment	Protects freedom of religion, speech, press, assembly, petition
2nd Amendment	Protects the right to keep and bear arms
3rd Amendment	Provides restrictions on quartering soldiers in citizens' homes
4th Amendment	Bans unreasonable searches or seizures
5th Amendment	Protects citizens against self-incrimination and being tried twice for the same crime; prohibits government from depriving citizens of life, liberty, or property without due process of law
6th Amendment	Protects citizens' right to a swift and fair trial
7th Amendment	Guarantees right to trial by jury
8th Amendment	Protects citizens against cruel and unusual punishment
9th Amendment	States that citizens have rights beyond those specifically written in the Constitution
10th Amendment	States that powers not given to the government are reserved to the states, or to the people
©Renzo luo/Shutterstock
Research Activity
As part of Celebrate Freedom Week, conduct research on the two most influential documents in U.S. history. First, read the Declaration of Independence and explore how it influenced subsequent American history and has inspired people for generations. In your own words, explain how the Declaration of Independence is still relevant in our lives today. Then, review a copy of the U.S. Constitution to explore how it has been amended throughout our nation's history. Give an example of how the Constitution or Bill of Rights protects your rights, and the rights of others.
221 CF4
1.
Citizenship in the United States is determined in several ways.
Citizens are expected to fulfill a number of important duties. Active citizen involvement in government and the community is encouraged.
-----------..........
The Big Idea
American citizenship involves great privileges and serious responsibilities.
Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship
If YOU were there...
Your older brother and his friends have just turned 18. That means they must register with selective service. But it also means that they are old enough to vote in national elections. You are interested in the upcoming elections and think it would be exciting to have a real voice in politics. But your brother and his friends don't even plan to register to vote.
How would you persuade your brother that voting is important?
Key Terms
naturalized citizens, p. 222 deport, p. 222 draft, p. 223
interest groups, p.225a political action committees, p. 225a
hmhsocialstudies.com
I TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on three ways a person can become a U.S. citizen.
I BUILDING BACKGROUND
What do you think it means to be a citizen j I of the United States? Have you ever enjoyed the rights or fulfilled the j I responsibilities of citizenship? What do you think the national identity is? S Use your prior experience and knowledge of U.S. citizenship to help you j understand this section.	\
Gaining U.S. Citizenship
People become U.S. citizens in several ways. First, anyone born in the United States or a territory it controls is a citizen. People born in a foreign country are U.S. citizens if at least one parent is a U.S. citizen. Foreign-born people whose parents are not citizens must move to the United States to become naturalized citizens. Once in the United States, they go through a long process before applying for citizenship. If they succeed, they become naturalized citizens, giving them most of the rights and responsibilities of other citizens.
In the United States, legal immigrants have many of the rights and responsibilities of citizens but cannot vote or hold public office. The U.S. government can deport, or return to the country of origin, immigrants who break the law.
Legal immigrants over age 18 may request naturalization after living in the United States for five years. All legal immigrants have to
2 CHAPTER 6
support themselves financially. If not, someone must assume financial responsibility for them. Immigrants must be law-abiding and support the U.S. Constitution. They must demonstrate understanding of written and spoken English. They also must show basic knowledge of U.S. history and government.
When this is done, candidates take an oath of allegiance to the United States. They then get certificates of naturalization.
Only two differences between naturalized and native-born citizens exist. Naturalized citizens can lose their citizenship, and they cannot become president or vice president. Many famous Americans have been naturalized citizens, including German Jewish scientist Albert Einstein and former secretary of state Madeleine Albright, originally from Czechoslovakia.
Reading Check
Drawing Conclusions
Why does U.S. law have such demanding requirements for people to become naturalized citizens?
Responsibilities of
Citizenship
For a representative democracy to work, Americans need to fulfill their civic duties. "The stakes ... are too high for government to be a spectator sport," former Texas congresswoman Barbara Jordan once said.
Civic Duties
Citizens elect officials to make laws for them. In turn, citizens must obey those laws and respect the authorities who enforce them. Obeying rules and laws includes knowing them and staying informed about any changes. Ignorance of a law will not prevent a person from being punished for breaking it.
Another duty is paying taxes for services such as public roads, police, and public schools. People pay sales taxes, property taxes, and tariffs. Many Americans also pay a tax on their income to the federal, and sometimes state, government.
Becoming a Citizen
For many people around the world, becoming a citizen ofthe United States is a lifelong dream. The highlight ofthe naturalization process is the ceremony where candidates promise to "support and defend the Constitution and laws ofthe United States of America."
Citizens have the duty to defend the nation. Men 18 years or older must register with selective service. In the event of a draft, or required military service, those able to fight are already registered. Although women do not register, many serve in the armed forces.
Americans have the right to a trial by jury under the Sixth Amendment. To protect this right, citizens should be willing to serve on a jury when they are called. Otherwise, fulfilling each person's Sixth Amendment rights would be difficult.
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 223
Responsibilities of Citizens
For representative democracy to work, citizens must do their part. Each activity pictured here serves an important role in the community.
Military Service
Civic Responsibilities
In addition to duties, which are required by law, citizens also have responsibilities to fulfill. These are not required by law, but are necessary for American democracy to work. Civic responsibilities are often considered to be an important part of the character of the country itself.
The most important of these responsibilities is voting. Voting is also one of our most important rights, because it shapes government policies. If citizens do not vote, they are not taking part in choosing who represents them in government. Elected representatives respond to the opinions of the voters who elect them. If only a small portion of constituents vote, the policies of the representative may not reflect the true opinion of the majority of people he or she represents.
To make the best choices in voting, people have a responsibility to stay informed on public issues and candidates. Information is available from many sources: the Internet, newspapers, television, other media, and from attending public meetings or listening to speeches. However, voters should also be aware that some material may be deliberately biased to support or discredit a particular viewpoint. Comparing many sources of information and opinions can help voters
make the decision that best represents what they want the government to do.
Society benefits when people fulfill their personal responsibilities, because it means that people take responsibility for the consequences of their behavior, whether good or bad. These responsibilities are different for everyone, but might include supporting one's family, attending school, working at a job, or caring for a pet. When people fulfill their personal responsibilities, it puts less strain on the resources of other people and the government.
The responsibilities of U.S. citizens are some of the most basic aspects of the national identity. The United States was founded on the principles of democracy and the idea that each citizen should have a voice in the nation's government. Some other nations have used these ideas as a template for their own democracies, so that the U.S. today is known for its citizens' responsibility and right to vote. Keeping informed about issues is also part of the national identity. Following poll and election results, for example, is a common activity for many Americans.
Making Inferences Why
do the rights of citizenship carry certain responsibilities?
READING CHECK
CHAPTER 6
Obey the Law
'’VHHi
WW^'^WW?' WWW
HS ANALYSIS 1
'■■■■■ ■iilStSB SKILLS
Analyzing Visuals Which responsibilities can you fulfill now, without waiting until you turn 18 years old?



First Amendment Rights
Many of the rights enjoyed by U.S. citizens are specifically protected by the Constitution. As you have read, the 27 amendments are especially important tools to protect these rights. Many of the amendments protect voting rights and the rights of people accused of crimes. The rights protected by the first 10 amendments, or the Bill of Rights, were so important to the founders that they were included before the government went into effect.
The rights protected by the First Amendment are considered by many people to be the most fundamental to the identity of the nation. The First Amendment reads:
^Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.
This amendment prevents the government from making policies that support one religion over another. It also allows people to practice any religion they want or no religion at all. The freedom of religion has shaped the American way of life since colonial times. Several colonies were founded to protect
religious freedom. The freedom of religion has led to the existence of a wide variety of kinds of worship in the United States. Having many choices for religious worship is one part of the American national identity.
The right to free speech and a free press allow citizens to express their viewpoints, even if they are critical of the government or elected officials. These rights are necessary for a constitutional republic because citizens need to be informed about the government, elected officials, policies, and issues so that people can hear important facts and opinions when making voting decisions. They are also valuable for sharing new information and stories that can educate, entertain, or promote invention.
The final two rights mentioned in the First Amendment, the right to assemble and the right to petition the government, are directly related to British policies toward the colonies. British authorities tried to stop the revolutionary movement by arresting people who gathered to discuss the issues. They also ignored petitions for change by claiming the colonists were not following the correct rules in asking for different laws.
Recall What kinds of rights
are described in the First Amendment?
reading Check ,
CITIZENSHIP ANDTHE CONSTITUTION 225
Academic
Vocabulary
influence
change or have an effect on
Citizens and Government
Even after an election, people can influence officials. Political participation is part of our nation's identity and tradition. When colonists protested British rule in the 1700s, they formed committees and presented their views to political leaders.
Influencing Government
As the new American nation grew, so did political participation. French diplomat Alexis de Tocqueville visited the United States in 1831 to study American democracy. He was amazed at the large number of political groups Americans participated in. He wrote about them:
^What political power could ever carry on the vast multitude [large number] of lesser undertakings which the American citizens perform every day, with the assistance ofthe principle of association [joining a group]? Nothing, in my opinion, is more deserving of our attention than the intellectual and moral associations of America/'
—Alexis de Tocqueville, Democracy in America
U.S. citizens sometimes work with interest groups. These groups of people share a common interest that motivates them to take political action. Interest groups organize speeches and rallies to support their cause. However, citizens need not join a group to influence government. They can write letters to leaders of government or attend city council meetings. Active political participation is an important duty for U.S. citizens and immigrants alike.
In addition to voting, many Americans choose to campaign for candidates or issues. Anyone can help campaign, even if he or she is not eligible to vote. Many people also help campaigns by giving money directly or through political action committees (PACs), groups that collect money for candidates who support certain issues.
Helping the Community
Commitment to others moves many Americans to volunteer in community service groups. Some small communities rely on volunteers for services such as fire protection and law enforcement. The American Red Cross helps citizens in times of natural disasters or other
emergencies. The Boy Scouts and Girl Scouts plan many projects such as planting trees to improve the environment. Even simple acts such as picking up trash in parks or serving food in shelters help a community.
Summarizing In what ways
do volunteer groups benefit the community?
Reading Check .
I SUMMARY
1 you learne
AND PREVIEW
In this section d about citizens' duties toward their nation and their communities. In the next chapter you will learn about the first government formed under the Constitution. Section 3 Assessment
I hmhsocialstudies.com i
ONLINE QUIZ
' Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
;	1. a. Summarize What are the criteria for becoming a
; naturalized citizen ofthe United States?
■	b. Explain What is the process by which one can become a naturalized citizen ofthe United States? c. Make Inferences Why do you think the law
j requires an immigrant to live in the United States at least five years before he or she can become a naturalized citizen?
2. a. Identify What are four duties expected of U.S.
; citizens?
b.	Explain Why is it important for citizens to obey the rules and laws of the nation?
c.	Recall Why must citizens pay taxes and how are taxes used?
; d. Identify What is the selective service? Who reg-
■	isters for selective service?
e.	Analyze Why is it important for citizens to serve on juries when called to do so?
f.	Evaluate In your opinion, which duty expected of
! citizens is the most important? Explain your answer.
’ 3. a. Define What are civic responsibilities? Why are they important to fulfill? Name three.
i	b. Explain How does voting help democracy work?
j	c. Draw Conclusions What would happen to a
democracy in which few people voted?
d.	Analyze Why should people stay informed on public issues?
e.	Identify What are some examples of personal responsibilities?
f.	Evaluate Why is it important for people to accept the consequences of their personal behavior?
g.	Make Inferences How might one help support one's family?
h.	Explain How do the responsibilities of citizens reflect the American national identity?
4. a. Recall Which rights are protected by the First Amendment?
b. Describe Why is the right to free speech important in a constitutional republic?
c.	Describe Why is the right to a free press important in a constitutional republic?
d.	Describe Why are the rights of petitioning and assembly important in a constitutional republic?
e.	Explain Why was it important to the authors of the Bill of Rights that these rights be protected?
f.	Analyze Explain how the rights of citizens reflect the American national identity.
g.	Analyze How does the freedom of religion affect the American way of life?
5.	a. Identify In what ways can citizens participate in the election process?
b.	Define What is an interest group?
c.	Make Inferences Why do you think it is important that citizens participate in the political process?
Critical Thinking
6.	Categorizing Review your notes on becoming a U.S. citizen. Then add the responsibilities of citizenship to your graphic organizer. As a class, discuss the topics in the section and how they relate to your own background knowledge. Ask your teacher or classmates for clarification of any language or sentences used in the book that you don't understand. Summarize for the class why you chose to categorize the responsibilities in the way that you did.
on Writing
io
IMMb
^WriteSmart
7. Thinking about Citizenship The last page of your pamphlet will have two parts—one part on requirements for citizenship and one part on the responsibilities of citizens. Look back through this section and make two lists, one on requirements and one on responsibilities.
I
CITIZENSHIP ANDTHE CONSTITUTION 225b
Social Studies Skills
Analysis
Critical
Thinking
Civic
Participation
Study
Understanding Historical Interpretation
Define the Skill
Historical interpretations are ways of explaining the past. They are based on what is known about the people, ideas, and actions that make up history. Two historians can look at the same set of facts about a person or event of the past and see things in different ways. Their explanations of the person or event, and the conclusions they reach, can be very different. The ability to recognize, understand, and evaluate historical interpretations is a valuable skill in the study of history.
Learn the Skill
When people study the past, they decide which facts are the most important in explaining why something happened. One person may believe certain facts to be important, while other people may believe other facts are more important. Therefore, their explanation of the topic, and the conclusions they draw about it, may not be the same. In addition, if new facts are uncovered about the topic, still more interpretations of it may result.
Asking the following questions will help you to understand and evaluate historical interpretations.
1.	What is the main idea in the way the topic is explained? What conclusions are reached? Be aware that these may not be directly stated but only hinted at in the information provided.
2.	On what facts has the writer or speaker relied? Do these facts seem to support his or her explanation and conclusions?
3.	Is there important information about the topic that the writer or speaker has dismissed
or ignored? If so, you should suspect that the interpretation may be inaccurate or deliberately slanted to prove a particular point of view.
Just because interpretations differ, one is not necessarily "right" and others "wrong." As long as a person considers all the evidence and draws conclusions based on a fair evaluation of that evidence, his or her interpretation is probably acceptable.
Remember, however, that trained historians let the facts lead them to conclusions. People who start with a conclusion, select only facts that support it, and ignore opposing evidence produce interpretations that have little value for understanding history.
[ Practice the Skill
Historians have different views on which documents and ideas were most influential on the framers of the Constitution. Some believe that Enlightenment writers provided the strongest reason for writing the Constitution, while others think that the practice of self-government in the colonies influenced the writing of the Constitution the most.
Review the documents and ideas that influenced the framing of the Constitution. Then answer the following questions.
1.	Which facts in the textbook support each viewpoint? Are there any that support both?
2.	Which view do you think is more convincing?
Explain why.
3.	Which viewpoint do you think the framers would have agreed with? Explain why you think this. Include facts to support your opinion.
CHAPTER 6
Chapter Review
Visual Summary
Use the visual summary below to help you review the main ideas of the chapter.
Reviewing Vocabulary, Terms, and People
1.	Who promised to add a bill of rights to the U.S. Constitution?
a.	Benjamin Franklin c. Alexander Hamilton
b.	Thomas Jefferson d. James Madison
2.	What is the term for a person born in another country who becomes a citizen of the United States?
a.	immigrant	c. naturalized citizen
b.	partial citizen	d. separatist
3.	What are powers granted to the states called?
a.	reserved powers	c. stately powers
b.	concurrent powers d. delegated powers
4.	What is the permission to look for evidence of a crime in a particular location called?
a.	petition	c. indictment
b.	impeachment	d. search warrant
5.	Who was the first female Supreme Court justice?
a.	Abigail Adams	c. Barbara Jordan
b.	Susan B. Anthony d. Sandra Day
O'Connor
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 227
Comprehension and
Critical Thinking
SECTION 1 (Pages 182-186)
6.	a. Describe Name each branch of government and explain the duties of each.
b.	Analyze What checks and balances exist between the branches of government?
c.	Evaluate Do you think the three branches of government share their power equally? Explain your answer.
SECTION 2 (Pages 216-221)
7.	a. Identify What is the Bill of Rights, and why was it added to the Constitution?
b.	Summarize In what ways does the Bill of Rights protect individuals from the power of government?
c.	Elaborate Which of the amendments in the Bill of Rights do you think is the most important? Why?
SECTION 3 (Pages 222-225)
8.	a. Describe What are the ways in which a person can gain U.S. citizenship?
b.	Analyze How are citizens able to influence their government?
c.	Predict What might result if individuals failed to fulfill their duties as citizens?
Reading Skills
Summarizing Historical Texts Use the Reading Skills taught in this chapter to answer the question about the reading selection below.
'''	i
"The judicial power of the United States shall be vested in one supreme Court, and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time > to time ... establish. The Judges, both of the	i
supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold their Offices during good Behavior, and ... receive for : their Services a Compensation..."
9.	Which of the following is the best summary of the selection?
a.	The U.S. judiciary consists of the Supreme Court and lower courts, and judges are paid.
b.	Congress creates lower courts.
Reviewing Themes
10.	Politics Explain how each of the following documents have influenced the U.S. system of government: Magna Carta, the English Bill of Rights, the Mayflower Compact, the Federalist Papers, and antifederalist writings.
11.	Politics What important ideas has the U.S. Constitution contributed to government?
12.	Politics Why is active political participation an important responsibility for people in the United States?
Social Studies Skills
Understanding Historical Interpretation Use the Social Studies Skills taught in this chapter to answer the question below.
13.	Research a current issue being debated in the news media. Identify different points of view on the issue and describe the historical context and frames of reference of those viewpoints. Then summarize each viewpoint. Finally, determine your own opinion on the issue and write a summary of it.
myWriteSmart
14. Creating a Pamphlet You have gathered information about the Constitution, Bill of Rights, and citizenship. Use that information to create your pamphlet. On the first page, write a title and a phrase that will get your audience's attention. On each of the following pages, you can use this format: (1) a heading and sentence at the top of the page identifying the topic of the page, and (2) the list of the most important points for that topic. Remember that page 2 is on the Constitution, page 3 is on the Bill of Rights, and page 4 is on citizenship.
I CHAPTER 6
CHAPTER
Texas Test Practice
DIRECTIONS:
Read each question and write the letter of the best response. 1	Which of the following rights is a right protected in the First Amendment?
A the right to bear arms B the right to public education C the right to jury trials D the right to free speech
2	The right of every American to be a member of a political party is an example of
F the principle of dual sovereignty.
G the First Amendment right to freedom of assembly.
H the principle of majority rule.
J the Fifth Amendment right to due process of law.
3	Obeying laws, paying taxes, and willingness to serve on a jury are all
A methods of gaining U.S. citizenship.
B duties of U.S. citizens.
C ways in which citizens can influence their government.
D protected by the Second Amendment.
4	The First Amendment would protect
F a reporter that knowingly spreads lies about someone.
G an individual who peacefully protests a government policy.
H an individual who falsely shouts, “Fire” in a crowded theater.
J a hunter who keeps a rifle at home.
5	Which of the following is an example of a check that the executive branch has on the legislative branch?
A
The president may declare laws unconstitutional. B
The vice president serves as president of the Senate. C
The president may veto bills passed by Congress. D
The president may appoint members of Congress. 6	Which of the following protects the rights of the accused?
F the guarantee of a speedy trial
G the right to vote cannot be denied because of sex
H the right to sign a petition J the right to keep and bear arms
7	Read the following quote from President Lyndon Johnson and use it to answer the question below.
Z/What a president says and thinks is not worth five cents unless he has the people and Congress behind him. Without Congress, I’m just a six-feet-four Texan. With Congress, I’m President of the United States in the fullest sense.
— President Lyndon Johnson, quoted in The Macmillan Dictionary of Political Quotations
Document-Based Question What point about government was President Johnson making in this remark?
CITIZENSHIP AND THE CONSTITUTION 229
tne reaerai government
^WriteSmart
A
Nobel Nomination Every year a few people are nominated for a Nobel Prize for their work to improve the world. In this chapter you will read about four great Americans—Washington, Hamilton, Jefferson, and Adams. Then you'll choose one of these great leaders and write a Nobel Prize nomination for him. If there are any terms, sentences, or ideas you aren't sure you understand as you read the chapter, ask your teacher or classmates to help you understand them. 1789
George Washington becomes the
first president.
1789
The French Revolution begins.
World
